src/fastspell_dictionaries/qu_BO.dic
achnimuy/V
ajllapayachimuy/V
akanakuy/V
allichanakuy/V
allwiripuy/V
anchayaykukuy/V
ansaqechikuy/V
aqhachikuy/V
arinlay/V
arwikuy/V
astanpuy/V
atiysiy/V
ayachimuy/V
aymurachiy/V
ayqerikuy/V
añaykacharikuy/V
ch'ajyarikuy/V
ch'anparipuy/V
ch'aranyariy/V
ch'ataykuy/V
ch'ijmijuchipuy/V
ch'imsiykullay/V
ch'irmaykachanakuy/V
ch'itarripuy/V
ch'ojurichiy/V
ch'ullmirimuy/V
ch'usachipuy/V
ch'utanpuy/V
ch'uykuchikuy/V
chajllirikapuy/V
chakataykukuy/V
chanchachimuy/V
chanqachipuy/V
chapullayarikuy/V
chaskirimuy/V
chhachanpuy/V
chhajririkuy/V
chhamchirichiy/V
chhapllatarichiy/V
chhaskirimuy/V
chhillchiykuy/V
chhusunpuy/V
chijchirimuy/V
chimparimuy/V
chipurimuy/V
chirmaykuy/V
chqanñichikuy/V
chukupayarichiy/V
chumpinakuy/V
churachimuy/V
churpupuy/V
ijiykuy/V
inqhechikuy/V
irqechallay/V
ithurapuy/V
jach'ipuy/V
jallch'uysikuy/V
jamumuy/V
jananpuy/V
janllarayaysiy/V
janqocharipuy/V
jap'inpuy/V
jaqemuy/V
jark'arichiy/V
jatunyaykuy/V
jawkachipuy/V
jayllirichiy/V
jaytararichiy/V
jich'akapuy/V
jinch'arichiy/V
jiq'eqarichiy/V
juch'uyyaripuy/V
jumirimuy/V
junuk'achikuy/V
juq'oyarichiy/V
jut'unpuy/V
juypuriy/V
k'ajllanchay/V
k'amillay/V
k'arachikuy/V
k'askannarikuy/V
k'awchirichiy/V
k'illimsarichiy/V
k'iranakuy/V
k'irukapuy/V
k'isumuy/V
k'ullpiriy/V
k'umuykuchikapuy/V
k'urpannamuy/V
kachachachachiy/V
kachipachiy/V
kallpakapuy/V
kamaripuy/V
kaqkaykachachikuy/V
kaskikuriy/V
kawsaykukuy/V
khakachariy/V
khallkiykuy/V
khankikanpuy/V
kharkakanpuy/V
khatatakanpuy/V
khishkakanpuy/V
khunaykuy/V
khuskuysiy/V
kicharinpuy/V
kimsak'uchucharipuy/V
kirunnakamuy/V
kulliyay/V
kunuñunuykukuy/V
kusiysikuy/V
kuyukamuy/V
larq'anpuy/V
llajllakanakuy/V
llalliripuy/V
llanpaykukuy/V
llapikamuy/V
llaqayaykukuy/V
llawch'iykuy/V
llijch'anpuy/V
llillillay/V
lliojyanpuy/V
llirqoysiy/V
llojuchikuy/V
llulluyachikuy/V
llup'ikamuy/V
llust'ichiy/V
machachiy/V
majllanakuy/V
mallikamuy/V
mamupuy/V
mantarayay/V
marq'akanpuy/V
mat'ukanpuy/V
mayt'ullay/V
michikamuy/V
millmannakapuy/V
mininchariy/V
mirararipuy/V
misk'iyarichikuy/V
mojch'iykuy/V
muchukapuy/V
mullkuyaykukuy/V
muq'eykuy/V
mururipuy/V
muspaykukuy/V
muyuchachikuy/V
nanakanpuy/V
nichipuy/V
onqojyakamuy/V
p'ajcharipuy/V
p'allqay/V
p'apichallay/V
p'atanpuy/V
p'ijtakuy/V
p'itwikamuy/V
p'unpuyallay/V
pachajchapuy/V
pallqorimuy/V
panqoripuy/V
parichichiy/V
paskanakuy/V
pawqaykuy/V
phallallay/V
pharsanakuy/V
phawaykurichipukuy/V
phiskuykukuy/V
phojpuykukuy/V
phupachaykukuy/V
phusuqollay/V
piganpuy/V
pillurikapuy/V
piqaysiy/V
pisiyachikuy/V
piñaschachiy/V
pukarmanakamuy/V
punkimanakamuy/V
puririkuy/V
puyllukuy/V
q'ajñillay/V
q'apallay/V
q'aspallay/V
q'aymarayapuy/V
q'ellinpuy/V
q'enqokamuy/V
q'epnanakuy/V
q'ewakariy/V
q'olltikuy/V
q'oshñiy/V
qachakamuy/V
qallqakanpuy/V
qanchischachimuy/V
qaranchanpuy/V
qasakanpuy/V
qayllakanpuy/V
qelqachaykukuy/V
qeqoykuy/V
qhallallanakuy/V
qhaparqachallay/V
qharqoripuy/V
qhatakamuy/V
qhawakamuy/V
qhelqanpuy/V
qhespirimuy/V
qhonñichipuy/V
qhoruchiy/V
qolliykacharipuy/V
qomaykuy/V
qopuy/V
qorpacharimuy/V
rajrarikuy/V
ranaykuy/V
rantinchachimuy/V
raqhayakanpuy/V
rawikanpuy/V
rijch'achimuy/V
rikuykukuy/V
risariy/V
rojyachimuy/V
runachimullay/V
ruphakanpuy/V
ruwakapuy/V
sajwarikuy/V
sanachachikuy/V
sankuyachiy/V
sapayaripuy/V
saqachimuy/V
saruchachiy/V
sasiripunayay/V
sawnachikuy/V
senqallichikamuy/V
sijsipuy/V
sillp'ayarikuy/V
simp'akuy/V
sinqarkuchikuy/V
sip'iyachipuy/V
siq'akamuy/V
sirachimuy/V
sirqachikuy/V
siwichipuy/V
suaykuy/V
suniyakanpuy/V
supipuy/V
surunp'ichimuy/V
suyrukanpuy/V
t'akallay/V
t'ayqomuy/V
t'illayarimuy/V
t'ipkipuy/V
t'iukakuy/V
t'unachimuy/V
t'ustuchimuy/V
takuraykuy/V
tarpakapuy/V
thalaykuy/V
thasnuchiy/V
thunkiy/V
tijtiy/V
tojtuchipuy/V
tunkichikuy/V
tutichikuy/V
ullphukapuy/V
unacharikuy/V
upatukunakuy/V
urmaykachay/V
usnukuy/V
uyakachikuy/V
uyñichiy/V
wakirichiy/V
wankhachipuy/V
wanwaykukuy/V
warmachillay/V
watinkakanpuy/V
wayllukapuy/V
waywachiy/V
wijruyapuy/V
winkullay/V
wisq'arayariy/V
yajtupuy/V
yanqhachakanpuy/V
yawnaykachachimuy/V
yuptarariy/V
ñapuyakamuy/V
ñillay/V
ñuñuysiy/V
